Utah statutes.
41-1a-1317.   Selling or buying without identification numbers -- Penalty.

It is a second degree felony for a person to knowingly buy, receive, dispose of, sell, offer for sale, or have in his possession any motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or engine removed from a motor vehicle, from which the identification number has been removed, defaced, covered, altered, or destroyed for the purpose of concealing or misrepresenting the identity of the motor vehicle or engine.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

